Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.065

General obligation bonds—Issuance.

General obligation bonds issued by a city or town to pay for all or part of the costs of purchasing, acquiring, or constructing any public utility mentioned in RCW 35.67.020, or the costs of making any additions, betterments, or alterations thereto, or extensions thereof, shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1985 c 445 s 2.]